Maryland, session 2026, HB0821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article IV – Judiciary Department
4B.
(a) (1) The Commission on Judicial Disabilities has the power to:
(i) Investigate complaints against any justice or judge of the
Supreme Court of Maryland, any intermediate courts of appeal, the circuit courts, the
District Court of Maryland, or the orphans’ court; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0821*

HOUSE BILL 821
(ii) Conduct hearings concerning such complaints, administer oaths
and affirmations, issue process to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production
of evidence, and require persons to testify and produce evidence by granting them immunity
from prosecution or from penalty or forfeiture.
(2) The Commission has the power to issue a reprimand and the power to
recommend to the Supreme Court of Maryland the removal, censure, or other appropriate
disciplining of a justice or judge or, in an appropriate case, retirement.
(3) All proceedings, testimony, and evidence before the Commission shall
be confidential and privileged, except as provided by rule of the Supreme Court of
Maryland; the record and any proceeding filed with the Supreme Court of Maryland shall
lose its confidential character, except as ordered by the Supreme Court of Maryland.
(4) No justice or judge shall participate as a member of the Commission in
any proceedings involving that justice’s or judge’s own conduct, and the Governor shall
appoint another justice or judge as a substitute member of the Commission for those
proceedings.
(5) The Supreme Court of Maryland shall prescribe by rule the means to
implement and enforce the powers of the Commission and the practice and procedure before
the Commission.
(b) (1) Upon any recommendation of the Commission, the Supreme Court of
Maryland, after a hearing and upon a finding of misconduct while in office, or of persistent
failure to perform the duties of the office, or of conduct prejudicial to the proper
administration of justice, may remove the justice or judge from office or may censure or
otherwise discipline the justice or judge, or the Supreme Court of Maryland, after hearing
and upon a finding of disability which is or is likely to become permanent and which
seriously interferes with the performance of the justice’s or judge’s duties, may retire the
justice or judge from office.
(2) A justice or judge removed under this section, and the justice’s or
judge’s surviving spouse, shall have the rights and privileges accruing from the justice’s or
judge’s judicial service only to the extent prescribed by the order of removal.
(3) A justice or judge retired under this section shall have the rights and
privileges prescribed by law for other retired justices or judges.
(4) A JUSTICE OR JUDGE REMOVED OR RETIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR FUTURE JUDICIAL OFFICE.
(5) No justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland shall sit in judgment in
any hearing involving that justice’s own conduct.

HOUSE BILL 821 3
(c) This section is alternative to, and cumulative with, the methods of retirement
and removal provided in Sections 3 and 4 of this Article, and in Section 26 of Article III of
this Constitution.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.